Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. No later than December 31, 2022, the  Department of Human Services shall
report to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to human services a
comprehensive proposal for department staffing that is adaptable to achieve customer ser-
vice obligations, program outcomes and policy goals.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2102 (HB 2102-A) Page 1